Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.340

Opiate therapy guidelines.

The secretary of health shall coordinate and assist the regulatory boards and commissions of the health professions with prescriptive authority in the development of uniform guidelines for addressing opiate therapy for acute pain, and chronic pain associated with cancer and other terminal diseases, or other chronic or intractable pain conditions. The purpose of the guidelines is to assure the provision of effective medical treatment in accordance with recognized national standards and consistent with requirements of the public health and safety.

[ 1995 c 336 s 10.]